incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ob/ec__BASEPL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ciam</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ciach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/lesť__BASEPL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lestiam</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľstiam</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lesti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľsti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lestiach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľstiach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lesti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľsti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lesťami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľsťami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lesti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľsti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rozopr/a__BASEPL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ám</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iam</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ách</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cirk/ev__BASEPL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vám</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vi</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vách</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vi</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vi</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/česť__BASEPL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ctiam</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ctiach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cťami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cti</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vrát/ka__PL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ach</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krosien/ka__SG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krosien/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vrát/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="krosien/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vrát/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vrát/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyvýšenin/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="altistka"><i>altist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bagetka"><i>baget</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botaska"><i>botas</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cestička"><i>cestič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chňapka"><i>chňap</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denunciantka"><i>denunciant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dolka"><i>dol</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvierka"><i>dvier</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynka"><i>dyn</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="externistka"><i>externist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fluktuantka"><i>fluktuant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fučka"><i>fuč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guvernantka"><i>guvernant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hnačka"><i>hnač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hubka"><i>hub</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ihlička"><i>ihlič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarka"><i>jar</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanapka"><i>kanap</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klapka"><i>klap</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koncovka"><i>koncov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kočka"><i>koč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krosienka"><i>krosien</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krídlovka"><i>krídlov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kytička"><i>kytič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavička"><i>lavič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokálpatriotka"><i>lokálpatriot</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mamenka"><i>mamen</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mačička"><i>mačič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mikulka"><i>mikul</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="močovka"><i>močov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nakladačka"><i>nakladač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noticka"><i>notic</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obsluhovačka"><i>obsluhovač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="organistka"><i>organist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panvička"><i>panvič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perička"><i>perič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planinka"><i>planin</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podpaľačka"><i>podpaľač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomologička"><i>pomologič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pracka"><i>prac</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presilovka"><i>presilov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protagonistka"><i>protagonist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="páračka"><i>párač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pľúcka"><i>pľúc</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="referentka"><i>referent</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rotačka"><i>rotač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rybka"><i>ryb</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scientologička"><i>scientologič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinka"><i>sin</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sliepočka"><i>sliepoč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spinka"><i>spin</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolička"><i>stolič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="subjektivistka"><i>subjektivist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súpravička"><i>súpravič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terkelička"><i>terkelič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trampka"><i>tramp</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuberkulotička"><i>tuberkulotič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upútavka"><i>upútav</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vetrovka"><i>vetrov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vlásenka"><i>vlásen</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrátka"><i>vrát</i><par n="vrát/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vysielačka"><i>vysielač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výtyčka"><i>výtyč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zjazdovka"><i>zjazdov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="česačka"><i>česač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šnúročka"><i>šnúroč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žehlička"><i>žehlič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
